South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3412.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Title 2 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: CHAPTER 81 Joint Committee on Women's Reproductive Rights Section 2-81-10. (A) There is established the Joint Committee on Women's Reproductive Rights composed of five members. The five members must be appointed as follows: (1) three female Senators appointed by the President of the Senate, one upon the recommendation of the members of the majority political party in the Senate and two upon the recommendation of the members of the largest minority political party in the Senate; (2) three female members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House, two upon the recommendation of the members of the majority political party in the House of Representatives and one upon the recommendation of the members of the largest minority political party in the House of Representatives; and (3) one female representative of the community appointed by the Governor. (B) Members of the Senate and House of Representatives serve ex officio. The committee chairman must be one of the legislative members. The chairman is to be elected by the membership of the committee. Members must be appointed at the beginning of each legislative session. Section 2-81-20. The committee shall review legislation that affects women's reproductive rights and make recommendations to the General Assembly. Section 2-81-30. The committee may: (1) hold public hearings; (2) receive testimony of any employees of the State or any other witnesses who may assist the committee in its duties; and (3) call for assistance in the performance of its duties from any employees or agencies of the State or any of its political subdivisions. Section 2-81-40. The committee may adopt by majority vote rules not inconsistent with this chapter it considers proper with respect to matters relating to the discharge of its duties under this chapter. Section 2-81-50. Professional and clerical services for the committee must be made available from the staffs of the General Assembly and other state agencies and institutions. Section 2-81-60. The committee shall make reports and recommendations to the General Assembly and the Governor by December thirty-first of each year. These findings and recommendations must be published and made available to the public. Section 2-81-70. The members of the committee are entitled to receive the per diem, mileage, and subsistence as is allowed by law for members of boards, committees, and commissions when engaged in the exercise of their duties as members of the committee. These expenses must be paid from approved accounts of their respective appointing authority. All other costs and expenses of the committee must be paid in equal proportion by the Senate, the House of Representatives, and the Office of the Governor, but only after the expenditures have been approved in advance by the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House, and the Governor. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----